Utah statutes.
48-2a-103.   Reservation of name.

(1)  The exclusive right to a name may be reserved by:

(a)  any person intending to organize a limited partnership under this chapter and to adopt that name;

(b)  any domestic limited partnership or any foreign limited partnership registered in this state which, in either case, intends to adopt that name;

(c)  any foreign limited partnership intending to register in this state and intending to adopt that name; and

(d)  any person intending to organize a foreign limited partnership and intending to have it register in this state and adopt that name.

(2)  The reservation shall be made by filing with the division an application, executed under penalty of perjury by the applicant, to reserve a specified name.  If the division finds that the name is available for use by a domestic or a foreign limited partnership, it shall reserve the name exclusively for the applicant for a period of 120 days.  The name reservation may be renewed for any number of subsequent periods of 120 days.  The exclusive right to a reserved name may be transferred to any other person by filing with the division a notice of the transfer executed under penalty of perjury by the applicant for whom the name was reserved and specifying the name and address of the transferee.



Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session

